West Virginia, session 2025, HB2903.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: Article 6. landlord and Tenant. §37-6-32. Convenience Fees Prohibited. (a) A landlord shall not charge a convenience fee to a tenant's rental payment. (b) This prohibition shall not apply to any landlord that accepts a form of payment of rent which does not require a convenience fee for such payment.